Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.11 Uniform Septage Disposal Fee

46-12.11-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares as follows:

The bays, rivers, and associated watersheds of Rhode Island are unique and unparalleled natural resources that provide significant cultural, ecological, and economic benefit to the state, and it is in the best interest of the state and its citizens to preserve, protect, and restore our bays, rivers, and associated watersheds.

The formation of the Rhode Island Bays, Rivers, and Watersheds Coordination Team, pursuant to chapter 46-31 of the general laws, provides for the coordination of the functions, programs, and regulations that affect the bays, rivers, and watersheds and serves as the most effective way to transcend the limited responsibilities and jurisdictions of each agency, to address complex issues using an ecosystem-based approach, and to provide for continuity over time.

Discharges of wastewater from wastewater treatment facilities, despite the fact that these discharges are carefully regulated and monitored, are known sources of pollution that affect the water quality of the bays, rivers, and associated watersheds of Rhode Island.

Wastewater treatment facilities collect wastewater both from users of sewer systems, who pay fees for the utilization of the systems, and from septage transporters, who collect septage from users of onsite sewage disposal systems.

All persons or entities generating pollutants that affect Rhode Island’s bays, rivers and watersheds, including those who utilize onsite sewage disposal systems, should be required to contribute to the costs of providing effective pollution control, mitigating environmental degradation of ecosystems, restoring impaired ecosystems, and monitoring the environment to characterize the impacts of the pollutant loadings, including changes that may occur as the level of treatment is improved.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 30, § 1.

46-12.11-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context shall clearly indicate otherwise:

“Director” shall mean the director of the department of environmental management.

“Disposal facility” shall mean any wastewater treatment facility, or portion thereof, or any other facility that receives septage from septage transporters, pursuant to authorization by the department of environmental management.

“Disposal facility operator” shall mean the person responsible for operating the disposal facility, who has authority to charge fees for the receipt of septage.

“Person” shall mean an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation (including a government corporation), partnership, association, the Federal government, or any agency or subdivision thereof, a state, municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state, or any interstate body.

“Septage” shall mean any solid, liquid or semi-solid removed from a septic tank, cesspool, privy, domestic or other wastewater holding tank, or similar onsite sewage disposal system.

“Septage transporter” shall mean any person lawfully authorized to transport septage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 30, § 1.

46-12.11-3.
Uniform septage disposal fee created.

There is hereby created and established a uniform septage disposal fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 30, § 1.

46-12.11-4.
Assessment, collection, and deposit of fee.

Effective July 1, 2007, a uniform septage disposal fee in the amount of one dollar ($1.00) per every hundred gallons of septage, as defined by the director pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, shall be imposed on the disposal of septage at all disposal facilities in the state.

The fee shall be assessed by the disposal facility operator based on the volume of septage delivered by the septage transporter. The septage transporter shall be liable for the fee until it has been paid to the state, except that payment to the applicable disposal facility is sufficient to relieve the septage transporter from further liability for the fee.

The fees collected by the disposal facility operator shall be remitted four times per year to the state on a schedule prescribed by the director in regulation. All fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Bays, Rivers & Watersheds Fund, established pursuant to §

46-31-12.1

of the general laws, and shall be dispersed according to the purposes of that fund.

The director may adopt all necessary rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter, including but not limited to, defining the types of septage, e.g., residential, commercial, and industrial that are subject to the fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 30, § 1.